Washington statutes.
RCW 18.30.020

Examination of patient—Sanctions—Training and licensing examination.

(1) Before making and fitting a denture, a denturist shall examine the patient's oral cavity.

(a) If the examination gives the denturist reasonable cause to believe that there is an abnormality or disease process that requires medical or dental treatment, the denturist shall immediately refer the patient to a dentist or physician. In such cases, the denturist shall take no further action to manufacture or place a denture until the patient has been examined by a dentist or physician and the dentist or physician gives written clearance that the denture will pose no threat to the patient's health.

(b) If the examination reveals the need for tissue or teeth modification in order to assure proper fit of a full or partial denture, the denturist shall refer the patient to a dentist and assure that the modification has been completed before taking an impression for the completion of the denture.

(2) A denturist who makes or places a denture in a manner not consistent with this section is subject to the sanctions provided in chapter 18.130 RCW, the uniform disciplinary act.

(3) A denturist must successfully complete special training in oral pathology prescribed by the board, whether as part of an approved associate degree program or equivalent training, and pass an examination prescribed by the board, which may be a part of the examination for licensure to become a licensed denturist.

[ 2002 c 160 s 2; 1995 c 198 s 18; 1995 c 1 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 607, approved November 8, 1994).]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 198 ss 18-25: "Sections 18 through 25 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [May 1, 1995]." [ 1995 c 198 s 27.]